Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.033

State expenditure limit—Budget document to reflect.

The budget document submitted by the governor to the legislature under RCW 43.88.030 shall reflect the state expenditure limit established under chapter 43.135 RCW and shall not propose expenditures in excess of that limit.

[ 1994 c 2 s 7 (Initiative Measure No. 601, approved November 2, 1993).]

NOTES: